Hawaii statutes.
§653-2 Attachment of salary, etc. The
salary, stipend, or wages of the beneficiary may be attached for, and applied
in the payment of the beneficiary's debts, in the manner prescribed in this
chapter. [L 1890, c 50, §2; am L 1921, c 66, §1; RL 1925, §2847; RL 1935,
§4293; RL 1945, §10322; RL 1955, §238-2; HRS §653-2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next